Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 2
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION

27-60-201. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

On April 8, 2019, the Colorado behavioral health task force was created, bringing together individuals representing diverse and balanced perspectives with respect to issues such as adults, children, and families who are dealing with mental health or substance use issues, key executive agencies representing state, local, and tribal governments, criminal justice experts, advocacy groups, behavioral health experts, and consumers;

The mission of the behavioral health task force was to evaluate and create a plan to improve the current behavioral health system in Colorado;

The behavioral health task force focused on creating a behavioral health system that includes equitable access to whole-person care;

In September 2020, the behavioral health task force released its blueprint, subcommittee, and COVID-19 special committee reports that outline its vision for behavioral health reform; and

The findings and recommendations of the task force indicate that it is imperative that an improved behavioral health system in Colorado:

Provide equitable and meaningful access to services and care for Coloradans, regardless of ability to pay, co-occurring conditions, disability, linguistics, geographic location, racial or ethnic identity, religion, socioeconomic status, sexual orientation, age, gender identity, housing status, history of criminal justice involvement, payer source, culture, or any other factor;

Provide access to care that:

Integrates physical and behavioral health;

Is culturally and linguistically responsive, trauma-informed, and tailored to the individual and specific family needs; and

Prioritizes all aspects of health, including wellness, and early interventions and supports that help people stay successfully and meaningfully connected to the community where they live, work, and play;

Provides a continuum of services for children, youth, and adults, including meeting the unique needs of children and youth. Young people have different needs than adults and should be offered developmentally appropriate and culturally competent services.

Provides access to quality and affordable services in a variety of methods, including in-person and virtual services;

Provides access to behavioral health services in regions and communities without necessitating engagement with the criminal or juvenile justice systems;

Provides Coloradans with access to affordable care that keeps them healthy, and administrative efficiencies across the behavioral health-care industry align with payment models and incentives that drive quality and improved outcomes;

Includes a high-quality, trained, culturally responsive, trauma-informed, and diverse professional behavioral health workforce that delivers outcomes and equitable access to care; and

Provides Coloradans with an opportunity to achieve and maintain mental wellness by addressing social determinants of health, such as housing, transportation, and employment, in addition to the integration of physical and behavioral health care.

The general assembly further finds that in implementing the findings and recommendations of the Colorado behavioral health task force it is imperative to rely on all stakeholders working together to hold the behavioral health system accountable to ensure all Coloradans are receiving the care needed to fulfill the task force's aim of ensuring a quality behavioral health system.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that, to ensure a standard of high-quality, integrated, and consumer-centric access to behavioral health-care services, it is imperative that the recommendations and findings included in the blueprint created by the Colorado behavioral health task force be followed and that a single state agency, known as the behavioral health administration, be established to lead and promote the state's behavioral health priorities. It is imperative that the behavioral health administration transform the state's current behavioral health system by:

Coordinating and integrating the delivery of behavioral health services in Colorado;

Setting standards for the behavioral health system to improve the quality and equity of care;

Ensuring that behavioral health services respond to the changing needs of communities, monitor state and local outcomes, support tribal needs, and evaluate state efforts;

Improving equitable access to, quality of, and affordability of behavioral health services for Coloradans;

Preserving and building upon the integration of behavioral and physical health care that treats the whole person;

Leading and promoting Colorado's priority of addressing the increasing need for behavioral health services;

Eliminating unnecessary fragmentation of services and streamlining access;

Addressing social determinants of health as a core component of behavioral health outcomes;

Promoting transparency and accountability of behavioral health reform outcomes and spending of taxpayer dollars; and

Reducing administrative burden on behavioral health-care providers so they are able to focus on client care.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1097), ch. 48, p. 198, § 1, effective April 22.

27-60-202. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Behavioral health" has the same meaning as set forth in section 27-60-100.3.

"Behavioral health administration" or "BHA" means the behavioral health administration established in section 27-50-102.

(2.5) "Care coordination" means services that support individuals and families and initiate care and navigating crisis supports, mental health and substance use disorder assistance, and services that address the social determinants of health, and preventive care services.

Repealed.

"State department" means the state department of human services created pursuant to section 26-1-105.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1097), ch. 48, p. 201, § 1, effective April 22; (2.5) added, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2374, § 18, effective June 28.

L. 2022:

(2) amended and (3) repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1531, § 101, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

27-60-203. Behavioral health administration - timeline.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

On or before July 1, 2022, the behavioral health administration is established in the state department. During the time it takes for the BHA to become fully operational, it remains a part of the state department until a determination is made by the general assembly concerning the department it will be permanently located in.

On or before November 1, 2024, the state department shall provide a report to the joint budget committee, the public and behavioral health and human services committee of the house of representatives, and the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committees, concerning recommendations on whether the BHA should remain in the state department or be transferred to a different department within the state.

If the general assembly takes no additional legislative action on or before June 30, 2025, the BHA will remain in the state department.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1097), ch. 48, p. 201, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 2022:

(1), (2), (3), and (4) repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1531, § 102, effective July 1.

27-60-204. Care coordination infrastructure - implementation - repeal.

No later than July 1, 2024, the BHA, in collaboration with the department of health care policy and financing, shall develop a statewide care coordination infrastructure to drive accountability and more effective behavioral health navigation to care that builds upon and collaborates with existing care coordination services. The infrastructure must include:

A website and mobile application that serves as a centralized gateway for information for patients, providers, and care coordination and that facilities access and navigation of behavioral health-care services and support; and

A cloud-based platform to allow providers that do not utilize an electronic health record to actively participate in the care coordination infrastructure.

The BHA shall convene a working group of geographically and demographically diverse partners and stakeholders, including those with lived and professional experience, to provide feedback and recommendations that inform and guide the development of the statewide care coordination infrastructure developed pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section.

The department of health care policy and financing, the division of insurance in the department of regulatory agencies, and the working group created pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section shall determine how medicaid and private insurance existing care coordination services are aligned with the statewide care coordination infrastructure described in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

The BHA shall implement, directly or through a contractor, a comprehensive and robust marketing and outreach plan to make Coloradans aware of the website, mobile application, cloud-based platform, and associated care coordination services developed pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section.

The BHA shall ensure navigators are available through the website and mobile application developed pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section, as well as in specific regional locations. The statewide care coordination infrastructure is responsible for providing regional access to care coordination services.

The BHA shall utilize behavioral health administrative services organizations established pursuant to part 4 of article 50 of this title 27 to help individuals and families initiate care and ensure timely access to person-centered, trauma-informed, and culturally responsive quality crisis supports; mental health and substance use disorder services; and preventive care services, including services that address the social determinants of health. When possible, the care coordination infrastructure must integrate with other health-care system resources to serve individuals with complex needs.

In implementing the care coordination infrastructure developed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the BHA shall:

Train new and existing navigators on the behavioral health safety net system services for children, youth, and adults, behavioral health service delivery procedures, and social determinants of health resources. At a minimum, the BHA shall train existing managed care entity providers, employees of the 988 crisis hotline enterprise created in section 27-64-103, 911 dispatchers, BHA care coordinators and navigators, and other providers participating in other safety net provider settings;

Ensure that the care coordination infrastructure can direct individuals where to seek in-person or virtual navigation support;

Ensure that the administrative burden associated with provider enrollment and credentialing for navigators and care coordination providers is minimal;

As part of the annual report submitted pursuant to section 27-50-204, include a summary of outcomes for individuals who access the statewide care coordination infrastructure; and

Ensure the 988 crisis hotline established pursuant to article 64 of this title 27:

Responds to anyone experiencing a mental health or substance use crisis;

Documents referrals and transfers of care of persons with one or more community-based service providers, such as care coordination and care navigation services; and

Includes connections to:

The forthcoming Colorado behavioral health resource navigation system, which more quickly links individuals in crisis with available services;

The statewide and regional care coordination system;

Peer support services; and

The behavioral health crisis response system created pursuant to section 27-60-103.

Each behavioral health administrative services organization established pursuant to part 4 of article 50 of this title 27 shall:

Utilize navigators trained in the use of the care coordination infrastructure pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section to identify community-based and social determinants of health services and capacity, including on-the-ground local support to encourage participation and engagement in services;

Utilize navigators and coordinators to support individuals in connecting to the safety net system created pursuant to part 3 of article 50 of this title 27, including services not covered by an individual's insurance;

Monitor and report quarterly on the safety net system and safety net providers to support accountability in connecting individuals to services and the delivery of those services to individuals with the highest needs;

Support continued connection with the safety net system after an individual is discharged from hospitalization, the criminal justice system, an emergency department, or other behavioral health facilities, including withdrawal management facilities and jails, by building multi-sector, multi-system referral and outcome tracking into the care coordination system;

Require contracted providers to use the statewide care coordination system, report on outcomes, including how and when individuals accessed care, and work collaboratively with the care coordination entity to ensure individuals receive needed services in a timely manner; and

Any other duties required by law or the BHA.

Beginning January 2025, and each January thereafter, the department of health care policy and financing shall assess the care coordination services provided by managed care entities and provide a report as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing required by section 2-7-203. At a minimum, the report must include:

The number of individuals served by each managed care entity through care coordination;

Data on care coordination services provided by each managed care entity, including follow-up contacts to ensure clients were connected to services;

Data on efforts made to reconnect with individuals that did not initially follow through on care coordination services; and

Data on referrals to community-based services and follow-up services by each managed care entity for individuals served through care coordination services.

The BHA and any person that receives money from the state department shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate twelve million two hundred thousand dollars from the behavioral and mental health cash fund created in section 24-75-230 to the department of human services for use by the BHA for the purposes of this section.

This subsection (8) is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2374, § 19, effective June 28.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-177), ch. 223, p. 1607, § 2, effective July 1; (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), and (2) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1533, § 103, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Section 4 of chapter 223 (SB 22-177), Session Laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act changing this section takes effect only if HB 22-1278 becomes law and takes effect either upon the effective date of SB 22-177 or HB 22-1278, whichever is later. HB 22-1278 became law, and both bills have an effective date of July 1, 2022.

Cross references:

(1) For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 22-177, see section 1 of chapter 223, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

27-60-205. (Reserved)

27-60-206. Substance use workforce stability grant program - repeal.

There is established in the BHA the substance use workforce stability grant program, referred to in this section as the "grant program". The BHA shall administer the grant program and shall develop policies and procedures for the grant program, which must include a grant application process, criteria for awarding grants and determining the amount of a grant award, and the timeline for awarding grants and distributing grant money.

A substance use disorder treatment provider or a recovery provider, including providers that serve children, and a local government, as defined in section 27-60-501, is eligible for a grant. In order to receive a grant, a provider must submit an application to the BHA and must prioritize providing services to voluntary and civil clients.

The BHA shall accept and review grant applications and award grants. The BHA shall prioritize awarding grants to providers that offer same-day or next-day appointments, serve low-income and marginalized populations, or intend to expand the number of individuals they serve.

A grant recipient shall use a grant award to support direct care staff who spend fifty percent or more of their time working with clients. Supporting direct care staff may include temporary salary increases, recruitment and retention bonuses, and other tactics that support staff.

The general assembly shall appropriate to the state department fifteen million dollars from the behavioral and mental health cash fund created in section 24-75-230 for the grant program.

The state department, BHA, and any person who receives money from the BHA, including each grant recipient, shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

This section is repealed, effective June 30, 2027.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1281), ch. 182, p. 1218, § 3, effective May 18.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1281, see section 1 of chapter 182, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.